Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The agency shall report by January 15 each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing finance and policy on the following information by county: new text end new text begin (1) the total number of down payment assistance awards; new text end new text begin (2) the total amount awarded for down payment assistance; and new text end new text begin (3) the types of housing purchased, including but not limited to single-family houses, townhouses, condominiums, and manufactured housing. new text end